Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202550-1807
Complaints to office; form; full investigation; when; notice.

(1) Complaints to the office may be made in writing. The office shall also maintain a toll-free telephone line for complaints. A complaint shall be evaluated to determine if it alleges possible misconduct, misfeasance, malfeasance, or violation of a statute or of rules and regulations pursuant to section 50-1806. All complaints shall be evaluated to determine whether a full investigation is warranted.

(2) The office shall not conduct a full investigation of a complaint unless:

(a) The complaint alleges misconduct, misfeasance, malfeasance, or violation of a statute or of rules and regulations pursuant to section 50-1806;

(b) The complaint is against a person within the jurisdiction of the office; and

(c) The allegations can be independently verified through investigation.

(3) After receipt of a complaint, the Inspector General shall determine whether the office will conduct a full investigation. A complaint alleging facts which, if verified, would provide a basis for discipline under the Uniform Credentialing Act shall be referred to the appropriate credentialing board under the act.

(4) When a full investigation is opened on a private agency that contracts with the Office of Probation Administration, the Inspector General shall give notice of such investigation to the Office of Probation Administration.

Laws 2012, LB821, § 27;

Laws 2013, LB561, § 59;

Laws 2015, LB347, § 15;

R.S.1943, (2016), § 43-4320;

Laws 2025, LB298, § 30.

Uniform Credentialing Act, see section 38-101.